Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1431HZ (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 1010 Section 1. Section 261B.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Fees provided for in subsection 1 shall be set by rule 3 not more than once each year and shall be based upon the costs 4 of administering this chapter . 5 Sec. 2. Section 261B.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The commission shall collect a single, 8 nonrefundable annual authorization fee from each entity 9 authorized by the commission under section 261B.11 or 714.18 10 that does not pay a registration fee under subsection 1 or 11 chapter 261G. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 12 1, 2025, the fee amounts provided in this subsection shall be 13 in effect. The commission may increase the fee annually by 14 an amount not to exceed three percent. For the purposes of 15 this subsection, âprimary locationâ means the physical location 16 of the main campus of an entity, or the physical location of 17 the corporate office of an entity if there is not a physical 18 campus. 19 a. For an entity granted an exemption under section 261B.11 20 with a primary location in Iowa, two thousand dollars. 21 b. For an entity granted an exemption under section 261B.11 22 with a primary location outside of Iowa, three thousand five 23 hundred dollars. 24 c. For an entity subject to section 714.18 with a primary 25 location in Iowa, other than an entity that provides driver 26 education under section 321.178, two thousand dollars. 27 d. For an entity subject to section 714.18 with a primary 28 location outside of Iowa, other than an entity that provides 29 driver education under section 321.178, three thousand five 30 hundred dollars. 31